Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB93.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Firearm" has the same meaning as in KRS 237.060;
(b) "Handgun" has the same meaning as in KRS 237.060; and
(c) 1. "Target shooting" means the recreational use of a firearm or
handgun on targets.
2. "Target shooting" shall not include the use of a firearm or handgun
for hunting as defined in KRS 150.010 or when the use of a firearm or
handgun is justified in accordance with KRS Chapter 503.
(2) A person shall not target shoot carelessly, recklessly, or without regard for the
safety of any person, or in a manner that endangers or is likely to endanger any
person, pet, livestock, wildlife, or property.
(3) It shall not be a violation of subsection (2) of this section if a person participates
in target shooting:
(a) At a recreation facility designed for target shooting; or
(b) In an area with an unobstructed, earthen backstop capable of stopping all
projectiles and debris in a safe manner.
(4) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/7/2025 11:35 AM Jacketed